Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.080

Municipal bonds in adjoining state.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the valid bonds of any incorporated city having a population in excess of three thousand inhabitants as shown by the last decennial federal census or of any county or school district situated in one of the states of the United States which adjoins the state of Washington: PROVIDED, That the indebtedness of such city or school district, together with the indebtedness of any other district or other municipal corporation or subdivision (except a county) which is wholly or in part included within the boundaries or limits of the city or school district, less its water debt and sinking fund, does not exceed twelve percent, or the indebtedness of the county less its sinking fund does not exceed seven percent, of the valuation thereof for the purposes of taxation.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.20.080. Prior: 1937 c 95 s 4; 1929 c 74 s 7; 1925 ex.s. c 86 s 4; 1921 c 156 s 11e; RRS s 3381-7.]